Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB5.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 197 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Community and Technical College System Prison Education Program, or KCTCS Prison
Education Program, is hereby established within the department to provide inmates with intensive, hands-
on job training in high-demand workforce sectors.
(2) The department shall enter into a memorandum of agreement with the Kentucky Community and Technical
College System (KCTCS) as defined in KRS 164.001 in accordance with Section 2 of this Act to provide
academic instruction for the program.
(3) (a) The program established in subsection (1) of this section shall be located on the grounds of the
Northpoint Training Center.
(b) The department shall:
1. Manage facility operations, including operations related to safety and security;
2. Be responsible for all maintenance and repair of the facility, utilities, and facility supplies;
and
3. Provide inmate transportation to the facility, inmate meals and food services, and inmate
housing that is segregated from the general prison population.
(4) The program shall not be available to an inmate serving a sentence:
(a) Of imprisonment for life without possibility of parole;
(b) For escape or attempted escape; or
(c) For a sex crime as defined in KRS 17.500.
(5) (a) The department shall be responsible for the identification of candidates for the program, including
recruitment and selection, in accordance with the restrictions set forth in subsection (4) of this
section and as determined by the department.
(b) Selection of candidates for the program shall include consideration of:
1. Established security criteria;
2. Industry guidance for second-chance employment; and
3. The capacity of academic instructors to provide industry-recommended and high-need
training.
(6) An inmate who is selected and meets eligibility requirements shall be transported by the department to the
Northpoint Training Center facility.
(7) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A relating
to:
(a) The selection and eligibility of inmates for the program, including but not limited to the following
criteria:
1. The inmate's academic background;
2. Vocational counseling or testing that indicates the inmate has an interest or aptitude for a
particular trade; and
3. The inmate's willingness to abide by the attendance, academic, and behavioral requirements
of the program;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) The terms and conditions under which inmates may continue in the program;
(c) The adequate care, supervision, guarding, disciplining, maintenance, transportation, and housing of
inmates when assigned to the program;
(d) Availability and accessibility of post-release services, including consideration of education and
employment requirements in administering terms of probation and parole;
(e) The collection of data to include:
1. The number of inmates:
a. Participating in the program who receive an offer of employment prior to release;
b. Who successfully complete the program;
c. Who obtained employment following participation in the program; and
d. Who were unsuccessful and the reason for removal from the program; and
2. Following completion of the program and release from the facility, the number of inmates
with:
a. Successful completion of parole;
b. A violation of parole;
c. A return to prison as a result of a parole violation and the date the inmate returned;
and
d. A return to prison as a result of the commission of a new offense;
(f) Requirements of KCTCS employees, including:
1. Compliance with the department's institutional safety and facilities management policies and
procedures; and
2. Participation in the department's drug-testing program, including random screenings and
tests based upon reasonable suspicion of drug or alcohol impairment, as determined by the
warden of the institution, and at the cost of the department if the test is administered at a
department facility by a department vendor;
(g) Policies to permit remote instruction or services during emergencies or pandemics, consistent with
department and health advisories of the Commonwealth; and
(h) Any other regulations the department deems necessary and appropriate to carry out the requirements
of this section.
(8) Hours of classroom instruction shall model, to the extent possible, an average workday similar to what the
inmate can expect to experience in employment upon release.
(9) Instruction shall occur outside of any area accessible by the general population of the facility and inmates
participating in the program shall be segregated from the general prison population at all times.
(10) Potential employers shall have the opportunity to recruit and interview potential employees prior to parole.
(11) KCTCS shall:
(a) Construct a facility on the grounds of Northpoint Training Center to provide academic instruction
for the prison education program established in this section;
(b) Upon completion of the facility construction under paragraph (a) of this subsection, deed the facility
to the department which will bear responsibility for management, operations, security, and
maintenance. The details of the prison education program will be jointly determined by the
department and KCTCS outlined in a memorandum of agreement between the parties;
(c) Retain ownership, maintenance, and responsibility for all equipment related to academic instruction
within the prison education program;
(d) Ensure compliance with all applicable federal, state, and local laws;

CHAPTER 64 3
(e) Enter into and maintain all appropriate confidentiality and data protection agreements, including
nondisclosure forms, for all academic instruction employees accessing Commonwealth data;
(f) Provide academic instruction within the facility and all components required for instruction,
including a learning management system; and
(g) Determine program placement with regard to a participant's academic readiness.
(12) This section shall not be interpreted to:
(a) Create or confer upon any inmate any private right or benefit; or
(b) Limit the discretion of the department in determining and maintaining operational and security
requirements of the department.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 197 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The memorandum of agreement required under Section 1 of this Act between the department and the
Kentucky Community and Technical College System (KCTCS):
(a) Shall establish the duties and responsibilities of each party; and
(b) May be amended by the parties as necessary, including the addition of terms not required under this
section, to meet the needs of the program.
(2) The duties and responsibilities of the department shall include:
(a) Establishing rules of conduct for inmates participating in the program and maintaining decision-
making authority related to any disciplinary action for violations of the rules established under this
paragraph;
(b) Marketing the program across correctional facilities throughout the Commonwealth with inmates
who may meet eligibility requirements;
(c) Providing training for each college employee entering the facility or communicating with an inmate,
including necessary training related to safety, security, and relevant policies and procedures;
(d) Providing training for each college employee entering the facility or communicating with a
participating inmate virtually or in a distance format;
(e) For the training required under paragraphs (c) and (d) of this subsection, providing modules related
to:
1. Safety, security, and related policies and procedures;
2. The Prison Rape Elimination Act, 34 U.S.C. sec. 30301 et seq.;
3. Maintaining professional boundaries; and
4. The use of core correctional practices to effectively respond to behavior;
(f) Providing KCTCS with necessary data to operate the program, including:
1. The transfer and release dates of inmates participating in the program as required by the
United States Secretary of Education under 34 C.F.R. sec. 668.239;
2. A roster of inmates approved for the program to be submitted to the college's designated office
for each term;
3. Grades and course completions entered into the Kentucky Offender Management System;
4. Information to determine the last day of attendance; and
5. Information to assist in tracking graduates post-release;
(g) Helping to facilitate required verification, identification, and financial aid documents with identified
federal agencies for participation in the program;
(h) Providing operational support to successfully carry out the program, including:
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
1. Adequate security staffing to support the inmates participating in the program at the KCTCS
Prison Education Program campus and collaborating with external partners on reentry
services;
2. Office space, copier access, and utilities at no cost to KCTCS;
3. Clear processes and systems to pay for education expenses, for use by inmates participating in
the program;
4. Background checks of all KCTCS employees using the department's approved vendors and
processes;
5. Maintenance and replacement of learning technology onsite to ensure continuity in the
learning environment when technology malfunctions, including the use of department-issued
tablets; and
6. Facilitating the purchase and acquisition of class supplies at the beginning of each academic
term and charging the cost, along with books, to the participating inmate's financial aid
account; and
(i) Participating in joint meetings between the department and KCTCS to review program outcomes,
security issues, and facility updates each term.
(3) The duties and responsibilities of KCTCS shall include:
(a) Establishing rules of academic conduct for inmates participating in the program and maintaining
decision-making authority related to any disciplinary action for violations of the rules established
under this paragraph;
(b) Ensuring compliance with all applicable federal, state, and local laws related to student privacy and
department security procedures;
(c) Maintaining all instructional equipment that is provided by KCTCS within the facility, outside of
learning technology that is part of the prison environment;
(d) Providing marketing support for the program including:
1. Brand guidelines;
2. Program information;
3. Transfer pathways; and
4. Public relations requests related to the program;
(e) Developing and distributing a specific catalog or similar publication describing available programs,
services for inmates participating in the program, curriculum maps, and delivery options;
(f) Establishing and maintaining a companion website section to inform participating inmate's families,
department partners, and community supporters about the campus programs;
(g) Managing partnership components pertaining to the educational status of participating inmates,
including:
1. Initial college application completion and other educational records required for admission;
2. Academic records and materials to determine transfer credit and initial placement;
3. Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) completion and submission, including
eligibility criteria and financial aid payment options;
4. Facilitation of financial aid payments for tuition, books, and supplies on behalf of the
participating inmate, ensuring no direct disbursements to the inmate;
5. Orientation for participating inmates each term addressing:
a. College policies and procedures;
b. Program requirements;
c. FAFSA and payment plans;

CHAPTER 64 5
d. Code of student conduct and college student expectations; and
e. Available support services;
6. Completion of graduation application and transfer enrollment if desired;
7. Instructional materials that comply with the facility requirements of the department; and
8. Quality assurance processes, including:
a. Course evaluations;
b. Performance of the participating inmate;
c. Syllabi review; and
d. Faculty observation;
(h) Providing and managing staffing related to the academic components of the program, including:
1. Qualified and credentialed in-person and online instructors for coursework; and
2. Admissions, financial aid, advising, online library, tutoring, veteran support, transcript
collection, and academic support services on-site at the facility;
(i) Ensuring compliance with requirements of the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools
Commission on Colleges and requirements of the Department of Education for the program;
(j) Providing graduation ceremonies on-site; and
(k) Working with the department and external partners to match inmates who have completed the
program with employers and collecting and reporting job placement and data transfer on an annual
basis.
(4) The department and KCTCS shall negotiate the responsibility for the cost of licensing and certification
examinations if required by an academic program offered in the facility.
(5) This section shall not be interpreted to:
(a) Create or confer upon any inmate any private right or benefit; or
(b) Limit the discretion of the department in determining and maintaining operational and security
requirements of the department.
Section 3. KRS 196.281 is amended to read as follows:
(1) When a prisoner is released, the department shall issue to that prisoner, with the prisoner's consent, documents
regarding all of the following:
(a) The prisoner's criminal history in Kentucky;
(b) The prisoner's institutional history, including all of the following:
1. Any record of major disciplinary violations;
2. Whether the prisoner successfully completed programming approved by the department;
3. Whether the prisoner obtained a high school equivalency diploma or other educational degree
prior to incarceration, to the extent known or verifiable by the department;
4. Whether the prisoner obtained a high school equivalency diploma or other educational degree
while incarcerated;
5. The prisoner's work record prior to incarceration, including past employment and skills, to the
extent known or verifiable by the department, and to the extent the department is technologically
capable of providing this information; and
6. The prisoner's institutional work record, including skills obtained through any job training or
programming provided by the department; and
(c) Other information considered relevant by the department.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) When a prisoner is released, the department may, in conjunction with the Transportation Cabinet, issue to that
prisoner an operator's license or personal identification card that is a voluntary travel ID document pursuant to
KRS 186.417.
(3) In addition to the documents provided under subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the department shall issue
a certificate of employability to a prisoner if all of the following apply:
(a) The prisoner achieved one (1) or both of the following:
1. While incarcerated:[,]
a. Successfully earned one (1) or more of the following:
i.[a.] An educational credit pursuant to KRS 197.045(1)(a)2.;
ii.[b.] A program completion credit pursuant to KRS 197.045(1)(a)3.; or
iii.[c.] A work-for-time credit pursuant to KRS 197.047; or
b. Successfully completed the Kentucky Community and Technical College System Prison
Education Program pursuant to Section 1 of this Act; or
2. Prior to incarceration, earned a High School Equivalency Diploma, a high school diploma, a
college degree, certification from a vocational or technical education program that the program
was completed, or a diploma or degree from a correspondence postsecondary education program
approved by the department;
(b) The prisoner received no major disciplinary violations during the year immediately preceding his or her
release; and
(c) 1. The prisoner received a score or level of competence as determined by the department on a job
skills assessment test administered by the department or jail; or
2. The prisoner successfully completed the KCTCS Prison Education Program and received an
academic certificate, diploma, or degree.
(4) A certificate of employability issued pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall:
(a) Be issued to the prisoner when he or she is released from a correctional facility;
(b) Be on a form provided by the department;
(c) Be valid unless revoked by the department; and
(d) Not create relief from:
1. A requirement to register as a sex offender under KRS 17.510;
2. A driver's license, commercial driver's license, or probationary license suspension, cancellation,
or revocation;
3. A restriction on employment as a prosecutor or law enforcement officer; or
4. The denial, ineligibility, or automatic suspension of a health care professional's license due to a
substance use disorder.
(5) (a) The department shall revoke the certificate of employability provided under this section of any
individual who is convicted of a felony after receiving a certificate of employability.
(b) The department shall provide an individual whose certificate of employability has been revoked under
this subsection an opportunity to file a grievance through the department's prisoner grievance system.
The revocation of a certificate of employability is effective when the individual is notified of the
revocation.
(c) The revocation of a certificate of employability does not affect the right of an employer to rely on the
validity of the certificate of employability unless the employer knew before the individual was
employed that the certificate of employability was fraudulent.
(6) An individual shall not intentionally state or otherwise represent that he or she has a valid certificate of
employability issued by the department knowing that the statement or representation is false. An individual
who violates this subsection shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

CHAPTER 64 7
(7) Upon request, the department shall confirm whether a certificate of employability has been issued to a named
individual and whether the certificate is valid at the time of the inquiry and at the time of the department's
response to that inquiry.
(8) The department is not civilly liable for damages based upon its decision to issue or deny issuance of a
certificate of employability to any prisoner or for revoking or failing to revoke a certificate of employability
issued to any prisoner.
(9) (a) In a judicial or administrative proceeding alleging negligence or other fault, a certificate of
employability issued to an individual under this section may be introduced as evidence of a person's due
care in hiring, retaining, licensing, leasing to, admitting to a school or program, or otherwise transacting
business or engaging in activity with the individual to whom the certificate of employability was issued
if the person knew of the certificate at the time of the alleged negligence or other fault.
(b) In any proceeding on a claim against an employer for negligent hiring, a certificate of employability
issued to an individual under this section may be a defense for the employer as to the claim if the
employer knew of the certificate at the time of the alleged negligence, except in cases where the
employer knew or should have known the employee should not be hired for the position due to the
nature of his or her history, including criminal history relevant to the claim.
(10) The department shall notify incoming prisoners of the possibility to earn a certificate of employability.
(11) The department shall submit an annual report no later than September 1 of each year to the Governor and to
the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Licensing,
Occupations, and Administrative Regulations and the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary[General
Assembly], which shall include:
(a) The number of certificates of employability issued in the preceding twelve (12) months;[,]
(b) The rate of recidivism among released prisoners previously issued certificates of employability;[, and]
(c) Any other information the department deems appropriate to include; and
(d) Beginning September 1, 2029, the data in subsection (7)(e) of Section 1 of this Act.
Section 4. KRS 335B.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A[No] person shall not be disqualified from public employment[,] or[nor shall a person be disqualified] from
pursuing, practicing, or engaging in any occupation for which a license is required solely because of a:
(a) Prior conviction of a crime, unless the crime for which the person was convicted directly relates to the
position of employment sought or the occupation for which the license is sought; or
(b) Finding that an applicant lacks good character or fails to meet any other similar standard where a
criminal conviction is the sole basis for the finding.
(2) In determining if a conviction directly relates to the position of public employment sought or the occupation
for which the license is sought, the hiring or licensing authority shall consider the:
(a) [The ]Nature and seriousness of the crime for which the individual was convicted and the passage of
time since its commission;
(b) [The ]Relationship of the crime to the purposes of regulating the position of public employment sought
or the occupation for which the license is sought;
and
(c) [The ]Relationship of the crime to the ability, capacity, and fitness required to perform the duties and
discharge the responsibilities of the position of employment or occupation.
(3) There shall be a rebuttable presumption for any occupational license that requires good moral character
that the person applying for the license is of good moral character if, after the criminal conviction, the
person obtains a certificate of employability pursuant to Section 3 of this Act and the certificate has not
been revoked. This rebuttable presumption shall not apply if the conviction would qualify the individual as
a registrant as defined in KRS 17.500.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Section 5. The data collected pursuant to subsection (7)(e) of Section 1 of this Act shall be reported in
compliance with subsection (11) of Section 3 of this Act beginning with the September 1, 2029, report submitted by
the department.
Signed by Governor April 9, 2026.